src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_to_noun.lexc
LEXICON Z1_meZ_plural
+N+Abs+Pl:^VCT%>mit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>mikka K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>mitit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>i K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>mini K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mivut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+1PlPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:^VCT%>migut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>misi K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abs+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST K_plur ; !Z1_meZ 
+N+Abs+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>mitik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ

+N+Rel+Pl:^VCT%>mit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>mima K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1SgPoss+Orth/Alt+Use/-Spell:%>ma K_plur ;
+N+Rel+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>mivit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>isa K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>mimi K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mitta K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>missi K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>isa K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Rel+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>mimik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ

+N+Trm+Pl:^VCT%>minut TrmVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>minnut TrmVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>minnut TrmVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>inut TrmVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>miminut TrmVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mitsinnut TrmVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>missinnut TrmVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Trm+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>nut TrmVb ; !Z1_meZ 
+N+Trm+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>miminnut TrmVb ; !Z1_meZ

+N+Abl+Pl:^VCT%>minit AblVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>minnit AblVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>minnit AblVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>init AblVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>miminit AblVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mitsinnit AblVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>missinnit AblVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>nit AblVb ; !Z1_meZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>miminnit AblVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl:^VCT%>miniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>minniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>minniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>iniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>miminiit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mitsinniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>missinniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>niit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>miminniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl:^VCT%>mininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>minninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>minninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>ininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>mimininngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mitsinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>missinninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Abl+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>ninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ 
+N+Abl+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>miminninngaanniit K_plur ; !Z1_meZ

+N+Lok+Pl:^VCT%>mini LokVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>minni LokVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>minni LokVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>ini LokVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>mimini LokVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mitsinni LokVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>missinni LokVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Lok+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>ni LokVb ; !Z1_meZ 
+N+Lok+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>miminni LokVb ; !Z1_meZ

+N+Aeq+Pl:^VCT%>mitut AeqVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>mittut AeqVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>mittut AeqVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>itut AeqVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>mimisut AeqVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mitsitut AeqVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>missitut AeqVb ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Aeq+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>tut AeqVb ; !Z1_meZ 
+N+Aeq+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>mimittut AeqVb ; !Z1_meZ

+N+Ins+Pl:^VCT%>minik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>minnik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>minnik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>inik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>miminik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mitsinnik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>missinnik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Ins+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>it^POSST%>nik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ 
+N+Ins+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>miminnik K_plur ; !Z1_meZ

+N+Via+Pl:^VCT%>mitigut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Via+Pl+1SgPoss:^VCT%>mikkut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Via+Pl+2SgPoss:^VCT%>mikkut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Via+Pl+3SgPoss:^T%>isigut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Via+Pl+4SgPoss:^VCT%>mimigut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Via+Pl+1PlPoss:^VCT%>mitsigut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Via+Pl+2PlPoss:^VCT%>missigut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
+N+Via+Pl+3PlPoss:^T%>isigut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ 
+N+Via+Pl+4PlPoss:^VCT%>mimikkut K_plur ; !Z1_meZ
